Idaho, session 2026, H0499.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 20, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 20-251, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
20-251. UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEMS NEAR DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION FA-
CILITIES. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Mitigation measures" means actions, such as jamming, that are
taken to cause electronic interference to neutralize, intercept, dis-
able, or disrupt an unmanned aircraft system in order to prevent illegal
or harmful activity.
(b) "Nefarious manner" means a manner in which an unmanned aircraft
system is used for an illegal, dangerous, or harmful purpose. Such
purpose may include but is not limited to spying, smuggling contraband,
facilitating criminal activity, or posing a direct threat to public
safety or security of a correctional facility.
(c) "Proximity" means within two (2) nautical miles from the farthest
defined perimeter of a correctional facility.
(d) "Restricted airspace" means the airspace over a department of cor-
rection facility as depicted on visual flight rules navigation charts.
(2) The department of correction or a law enforcement officer or agency
may take reasonable and necessary mitigation measures against a threat posed
by an unmanned aircraft system operating in proximity to restricted airspace
within this state in a nefarious manner. Such measures may include but are
not limited to:
(a) The use of detection, tracking, and identification methods; and
(b) The interception or disabling of an unmanned aircraft system
through legal and safe methods, including but not limited to jamming,
hacking, or physical capture.
(3) The department of correction or a law enforcement officer or agency
may act pursuant to subsection (2) of this section only if there is reason-
able suspicion that the unmanned aircraft system is operating in a nefarious
manner within the proximity of the restricted airspace of any department of
correction facility where prisoners are held. The department of correction
or a law enforcement officer or agency shall not be liable for any loss of or
damage to an unmanned aircraft system due to mitigation measures taken pur-


suant to this section. The department of correction shall post notices on
roads near correctional facilities that the area is a "Drone No Fly Zone."
(4) The use of an unmanned aircraft system within the proximity of the
restricted airspace of a correctional facility shall be unlawful. Whoever
commits the crime of unlawful use of an unmanned aircraft system within the
proximity of the restricted airspace of a correctional facility shall be
fined not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year. In
addition to the sentence imposed pursuant to this subsection, the court
shall order the forfeiture of the unmanned aircraft system used in connec-
tion with the unlawful act.
(5) It shall be the responsibility of unmanned aircraft system opera-
tors to be familiar with all airspace restrictions and the location of cor-
rectional facilities and all other restricted airspace when operating un-
manned aircraft systems. Lack of knowledge that the prohibited act occurred
within the proximity of the restricted airspace of the correctional facility
shall not be a defense.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.